Massachusetts, session 194th, S2250.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 34B of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following:- 
The owner of said pole shall allow municipalities to access data through the National 
Joint Utilities Notification System (NJUNS) or any additional or successor pole management 
systems.  
When feasible, new poles shall be installed in full compliance with the Americans with 
Disabilities Act Standards for Accessible Design and Massachusetts Architectural Access Board 
Rules and Regulations (521 CMR). Any disruption to public infrastructure shall be brought to a 
state of good repair standard. 

of 2 10  In the event that a pole, wire or attachment is not removed within the required 90 days or 
the agreed upon timeframe, municipalities may move, relocate or remove utility poles, wires or 
attachments, or arrange for another party to move, relocate or remove utility poles, wires and 
attachments. Owners of such poles may be charged for said removal or relocation by a city or 
town. In the event that overdue removal of existing poles causes delays to associated municipal 
projects, municipalities may further charge owners of such poles for the total costs incurred due 
to such a delay and a reasonable administration fee. In the event of circumstances outside of the 
pole owners’ and attachees’ control, including work stoppages and adverse weather conditions, 
additional time beyond 90 days may be granted by the municipality. Municipalities may also 
suspend or delay the issuance of current, pending or future permits or licenses to the pole owners 
by no more than 30 calendar days after reaching compliance with pole removal deadlines. 
Municipalities may adopt bylaws and ordinances relating to (a) the imposition of fees or 
fines on electric distribution, telephone, and other companies that own poles or pole attachments 
that operate in the public right of way, (b) the assessment of taxes on utility companies that 
operate in the public right of way, (c) the licensing and permitting of utility companies that 
operate in the public right of way. 
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, municipalities 
and public utilities shall have the right to purchase utility poles from investor-owned utilities at a 
price that takes into account the depreciation in value of the utility poles.